Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.470

Multistate license—Publication on website.

The board shall publish on its website:

(1) All rules and requirements associated with the passage of the interstate nurse licensure compact, chapter 18.80 RCW;

(2) An annually updated summary of the key differences in each state's nursing practice act; and

(3) All meeting details, including meeting dates and times, locations, and methods of participation and sharing of comments for the compact administrator meetings.

[ 2023 c 123 s 16.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 123: See RCW 18.80.900.